Materials for lyx workshop/LyX.app/Contents/Resources/dicts/ca_XV.aff
FLAG num
SFX 521	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 521	ir	ir/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 521	ir	0/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 521	ir	a/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 521	ir	am/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 521	ir	au/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 521	ir	en/453	.		#imperatiu

SFX 522	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 522	aure	eya	.		#imperfecte
SFX 522	aure	eyes	.		#imperfecte
SFX 522	aure	éyem	.		#imperfecte
SFX 522	aure	éyeu	.		#imperfecte
SFX 522	aure	eyen	.		#imperfecte

SFX 523	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 523	aure	ea	.		#imperfecte
SFX 523	aure	ees	.		#imperfecte
SFX 523	aure	éem	.		#imperfecte
SFX 523	aure	éeu	.		#imperfecte
SFX 523	aure	een	.		#imperfecte

SFX 524	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 524	ure	vira	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte
SFX 524	ure	vires	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte
SFX 524	ure	vírem	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte
SFX 524	ure	víreu	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte
SFX 524	ure	viren	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte

SFX 525	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 525	ure	c/453	.		#present
SFX 525	ure	us/453	.		#present
SFX 525	ure	u/453	.		#present
SFX 525	ure	vim/453	.		#present
SFX 525	ure	viu/453	.		#present
SFX 525	ure	uen/453	.		#present

SFX 526	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 526	órrer	órrega/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 526	órrer	órregues/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 526	órrer	orregam/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 526	órrer	orregau/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 526	órrer	órreguen/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent

SFX 527	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 527	órrer	órrec/453	.		#present
SFX 527	órrer	orres/453	.		#present
SFX 527	órrer	orre/453	.		#present
SFX 527	órrer	orrem/453	.		#present
SFX 527	órrer	orreu/453	.		#present
SFX 527	órrer	orren/453	.		#present

SFX 528	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 528	órrer	orria	.		#imperfecte
SFX 528	órrer	orries	.		#imperfecte
SFX 528	órrer	orríem	.		#imperfecte
SFX 528	órrer	orríeu	.		#imperfecte
SFX 528	órrer	orrien	.		#imperfecte

SFX 529	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 529	órrer	orreguí	.		#perfecte
SFX 529	órrer	orregueres	.		#perfecte
SFX 529	órrer	orregué	.		#perfecte
SFX 529	órrer	orreguérem	.		#perfecte
SFX 529	órrer	orreguéreu	.		#perfecte
SFX 529	órrer	orregueren	.		#perfecte

SFX 530	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 530	órrer	orreré	.		#futur
SFX 530	órrer	orreràs	.		#futur
SFX 530	órrer	orrerà	.		#futur
SFX 530	órrer	orrerem	.		#futur
SFX 530	órrer	orrereu	.		#futur
SFX 530	órrer	orreran	.		#futur

SFX 531	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 531	órrer	orreguera	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte
SFX 531	órrer	orregueres	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte
SFX 531	órrer	orreguérem	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte
SFX 531	órrer	orreguéreu	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte
SFX 531	órrer	orregueren	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte

SFX 532	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 532	órrer	órrer/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 532	órrer	orre/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 532	órrer	órrega/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 532	órrer	orregam/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 532	órrer	orregau/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 532	órrer	órreguen/453	.		#imperatiu

SFX 533	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 533	órrer	orreria	.		#hipotetic
SFX 533	órrer	orreries	.		#hipotetic
SFX 533	órrer	orreríem	.		#hipotetic
SFX 533	órrer	orreríeu	.		#hipotetic
SFX 533	órrer	orrerien	.		#hipotetic

SFX 534	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 534	uar	üe/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 534	uar	ües/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 534	uar	üem/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 534	uar	üeu/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 534	uar	üen/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent

SFX 535	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 535	uar	uar/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 535	uar	ua/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 535	uar	üe/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 535	uar	üem/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 535	uar	üeu/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 535	uar	üen/453	.		#imperatiu

SFX 536	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 536	uar	üí	.		#perfecte
SFX 536	uar	uares	.		#perfecte
SFX 536	uar	uà	.		#perfecte
SFX 536	uar	uàrem	.		#perfecte
SFX 536	uar	uàreu	.		#perfecte
SFX 536	uar	uaren	.		#perfecte

SFX 537	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 537	uar	üe/453	.		#present
SFX 537	uar	ües/453	.		#present
SFX 537	uar	ua/453	.		#present
SFX 537	uar	üem/453	.		#present
SFX 537	uar	üeu/453	.		#present
SFX 537	uar	üen/453	.		#present

SFX 538	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 538	ure	c/453	.		#present
SFX 538	ure	us/453	.		#present
SFX 538	ure	u/453	.		#present
SFX 538	ure	vem/453	.		#present
SFX 538	ure	veu/453	.		#present
SFX 538	ure	uen/453	.		#present

SFX 539	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 539	éixer	eguí	.		#perfecte
SFX 539	éixer	egueres	.		#perfecte
SFX 539	éixer	egué	.		#perfecte
SFX 539	éixer	eguérem	.		#perfecte
SFX 539	éixer	eguéreu	.		#perfecte
SFX 539	éixer	egueren	.		#perfecte

SFX 540	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 540	éixer	éixer/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 540	éixer	eix/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 540	éixer	ega/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 540	éixer	egam/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 540	éixer	egau/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 540	éixer	eguen/453	.		#imperatiu

SFX 541	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 541	éixer	ega/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 541	éixer	egues/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 541	éixer	egam/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 541	éixer	egau/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 541	éixer	eguen/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent

SFX 542	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 542	éixer	eguera	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte
SFX 542	éixer	egueres	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte
SFX 542	éixer	eguérem	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte
SFX 542	éixer	eguéreu	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte
SFX 542	éixer	egueren	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte

SFX 543	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 543	éixer	ec/453	.		#present
SFX 543	éixer	eixes/453	.		#present
SFX 543	éixer	eix/453	.		#present
SFX 543	éixer	eixem/453	.		#present
SFX 543	éixer	eixeu/453	.		#present
SFX 543	éixer	eixen/453	.		#present

SFX 544	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 544	r	ga/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 544	r	gues/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 544	r	gam/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 544	r	gau/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 544	r	guen/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent

SFX 545	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 545	éixer	eixca/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 545	éixer	eixques/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 545	éixer	eixcam/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 545	éixer	eixcau/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 545	éixer	eixquen/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent

SFX 546	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 546	éixer	eixquí	.		#perfecte
SFX 546	éixer	eixqueres	.		#perfecte
SFX 546	éixer	eixqué	.		#perfecte
SFX 546	éixer	eixquérem	.		#perfecte
SFX 546	éixer	eixquéreu	.		#perfecte
SFX 546	éixer	eixqueren	.		#perfecte

SFX 547	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 547	éixer	éixer/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 547	éixer	eix/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 547	éixer	eixca/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 547	éixer	eixcam/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 547	éixer	eixcau/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 547	éixer	eixquen/453	.		#imperatiu

SFX 548	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 548	éixer	eixc/453	.		#present
SFX 548	éixer	eixes/453	.		#present
SFX 548	éixer	eix/453	.		#present
SFX 548	éixer	eixem/453	.		#present
SFX 548	éixer	eixeu/453	.		#present
SFX 548	éixer	eixen/453	.		#present

SFX 549	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 549	éixer	eixquera	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte
SFX 549	éixer	eixqueres	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte
SFX 549	éixer	eixquérem	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte
SFX 549	éixer	eixquéreu	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte
SFX 549	éixer	eixqueren	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte
