Materials for lyx workshop/LyX.app/Contents/Resources/dicts/ca_XV.dic
aiguar/451,455,456,457,458,534,535,536,537,828,1054
aixaguar/451,455,456,457,458,534,535,536,537,828,1054
antiquar/451,455,456,457,458,534,535,536,537,828,1054
atraure/451,481,482,499,500,501,502,509,514,522,523,1066
averiguar/451,455,456,457,458,534,535,536,537,828,1054
circumscriure/481,482,499,500,501,502,512,524,525,1032,1064
coliquar/455,456,457,458,534,535,536,537,828,1054
commoure/481,482,499,500,501,502,512,538,1061
comparéixer/518,519,520,539,540,541,542,543,605,1098
complaure/481,482,499,500,501,502,509,514,522,1046,1061
conéixer/518,519,520,539,540,541,542,543,1068
consentir/455,456,467,516,521,560,615,662,828,918,945,1054
contraure/481,482,499,500,501,502,509,514,522,523,1066
convaléixer/518,519,520,545,546,547,548,549,1069
córrer/526,527,528,529,530,531,532,533,1065
créixer/518,519,520,545,546,547,548,549,1069
decórrer/526,527,528,529,530,531,532,533,1065
decréixer/518,519,520,545,546,547,548,549,1069
desaiguar/455,456,457,458,534,535,536,537,828,1054
desaparéixer/518,519,520,539,540,541,542,543,605,1068
desatraure/481,482,499,500,501,502,509,514,522,523,1105
desbeure/481,482,499,500,501,502,512,538,1061
descomplaure/481,482,499,500,501,502,509,514,522,523,1061
desconéixer/518,519,520,539,540,541,542,543,1068
descórrer/526,527,528,529,530,531,532,533,1065
descriure/481,482,499,500,501,502,512,524,525,1064
desdir/455,456,467,544,565,575,594,598,661,701,828,1063
desmentir/455,456,467,468,469,516,521,560,828,1054
desmeréixer/518,519,520,545,546,547,548,549,1069
desplaure/481,482,499,500,501,502,509,514,522,523,1061
deure/481,482,499,500,501,502,512,538,1061
dir/455,456,467,544,565,575,594,598,623,661,828,1063
discórrer/526,527,528,529,530,531,532,533,1065
distraure/481,482,499,500,501,502,509,514,522,523,1066
dur/455,456,544,565,701,792,793,794,803,828,1063
embeure/451,481,482,499,500,501,502,512,538,1061
endur/451,455,456,544,565,701,792,793,794,803,828,1063
engaldir/451,456,467,468,469,544,575,828,942,1000,1054
entredir/451,455,456,467,544,565,575,594,598,623,828,1063
entrelluir/451,455,456,491,493,494,495,496,497,516,521,762,828,1114
entretraure/451,481,482,499,500,501,502,509,514,522,523,1066
escórrer/451,526,527,528,529,530,531,532,533,1065
escriure/451,481,482,499,500,501,502,512,524,525,1064
extraure/451,481,482,499,500,501,502,509,514,522,523,1066
incórrer/451,526,527,528,529,530,531,532,533,1065
inscriure/451,481,482,499,500,501,502,512,524,525,1042,1057,1064
junyir/455,456,467,468,469,516,521,574,593,595,828,1054
liquar/455,456,457,458,534,535,536,537,828,1054
mentir/455,456,467,468,469,516,521,560,828,1054
meréixer/518,519,520,545,546,547,548,549,1069
moure/481,482,499,500,501,502,512,538,996,1057,1061
paréixer/451,518,519,520,539,540,541,542,543,605,1068
permanéixer/451,518,519,520,545,546,547,548,549,1069
ploure/451,481,482,499,500,501,502,512,538,1044,1061
preconéixer/451,518,519,520,539,540,541,542,543,1068
predir/451,455,456,467,544,565,575,594,598,623,661,828,1063
prescriure/451,481,482,499,500,501,502,512,524,525,1064
presentir/451,456,467,468,469,516,521,560,597,599,828,998,1092
reaixaguar/455,456,457,458,534,535,536,537,828,1054
reaparéixer/518,519,520,539,540,541,542,543,605,1068
rebeure/481,482,499,500,501,502,512,538,1061
reconéixer/518,519,520,539,540,541,542,543,1068
recórrer/526,527,528,529,530,531,532,533,1065
recréixer/518,519,520,545,546,547,548,549,1069
reescriure/481,482,499,500,501,502,512,524,525,1064
resentir/455,456,467,468,469,516,521,560,615,828,918,1054
retraure/481,482,499,500,501,502,509,514,522,523,1066
retrotraure/481,482,499,500,501,502,509,514,523,1003,1066
sobrecréixer/518,519,520,545,546,547,548,549,1069
sobreescriure/481,482,499,500,501,502,512,524,525,624,625,626,627,628,629,1041,1064
somoure/481,482,499,500,501,502,512,538,685,686,687,688,689,690,691,692,1061
substraure/481,482,499,500,501,502,509,514,522,523,1066
transcórrer/526,527,528,529,530,531,532,533,1065
transcriure/481,482,499,500,501,502,512,524,525,624,625,626,627,628,629,1041,1064
traslluir/455,456,491,493,494,495,496,497,516,521,683,828,1055
